Massachusetts, session 194th, H439.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Section 25A of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 
2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:- 
(b) An individual, partnership or corporation that is granted, in the aggregate, two or 
more licenses under section 15 may combine the alcoholic beverages purchases of up to 9 such 
licenses for the purpose of attaining a quantity discount offered by a wholesaler licensed under 
section 18. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following new section:- 
Section 15G. Cooperative purchasing agreements. 

of 2 10  Any three or more license holders under section 15, but no more than seven such license 
holders, or the maximum number of licenses one licensee is allowed to hold under section 15, 
not to exceed 9 in the aggregate, may enter into a cooperative agreement to make joint purchases 
of alcoholic beverages in larger quantities than might otherwise be purchased for the purpose of 
attaining a quantity discount offered by a wholesaler licensed under Section 18; provided further 
that all alcoholic beverages purchased pursuant to any such agreement shall be distributed to 
none other than each licensee who is a party to such agreement.